test/src/morphology/adjDES_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that have a subform. 

Tests:
  Adjective - almulasj: # ÅLLAGASJ, DÁRBBOLASJ
    almulasj+A+Attr: [almulasj, almmulasj]
    almulasj+A+Sg+Nom: [almulasj, almmulasj]
    almulasj+A+Sg+Acc: [almulattjav, almmulattjav]
    almulasj+A+Pl+Nom: [almulattja, almmulattja]
    almulasj+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [almulabbo, almulæbbo, almulubbo]
    almulasj+A+Comp+Attr: [almulap, almulup]
    almulasj+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [almulamos, almulæmos, almulumos]

  Adjective - bavhlak: # AGAdj, BASSTEL
    bavhlak+A+Attr: [bavhlak, bavlak]
    bavhlak+A+Sg+Nom: [bavhlak, bavlak]
    bavhlak+A+Sg+Ine: [bavhlagin, bavlagin]
    bavhlak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bavhlagabbo, bavlagabbo, bavhlagæbbo, bavlagæbbo, bavhlagubbo, bavlagubbo]
    bavhlak+A+Comp+Attr: [bavhlagap, bavhlagup, bavlagap, bavlagup]
    bavhlak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [bavhlagamos, bavlagamos, bavhlagæmos, bavlagæmos, bavhlagumos, bavlagumos]

  Adjective - duplæksa: # BASSTEL, BOREÁLA
    duplæksa+A+Attr: [duplæksa, dupleksa]
    duplæksa+A+Sg+Nom: [duplæksa, dupleksa]
    duplæksa+A+Sg+Gen: duplevsa
    duplæksa+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    duplæksa+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - goanntsá: # GIEVRRA, HÁVSSKE
    goanntsá+A+Attr: goanntsás 
    goanntsá+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsá
    goanntsá+A+Sg+Ela: goanntsás
    goanntsá+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: goanntsáp
    goanntsá+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: goanntsámus

  Adjective - gájvas: # TJIEGOS
    gájvas+A+Attr: gájves
    gájvas+A+Sg+Nom: [gájvas, gájves]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Gen: [gájvvasa, gájvvása]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Acc: [gájvvasav, gájvvásav]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ill: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ine: [gájvvasin, gájvvásin]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ela: [gájvvasis, gájvvásis]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Com: [gájvvasijn, gájvvásijn]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Nom: [gájvvasa, gájvvása]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Gen: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Acc: [gájvvasijt, gájvvásijt]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ill: [gájvvasijda, gájvvásijda]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ine: [gájvvasijn, gájvvásijn]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ela: [gájvvasijs, gájvvásijs]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Com: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Ess: [gájvvasin, gájvvásin]
    gájvas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gájvvasabbo, gájvvásabbo, gájvvasæbbo, gájvvásæbbo, gájvvasubbo, gájvvásubbo]
    gájvas+A+Comp+Attr: [gájvvásap, gájvvásup, gájvvasap, gájvvasup]
    gájvas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gájvvasamos, gájvvasumos, gájvvasæmos, gájvvásamos,gájvvásæmos, gájvvásumos]

  Adjective - didaktalasj: # TJIEGOS
    didaktalasj+A+Attr: [didaktalasj, didáktalasj]
    didaktalasj+A+Sg+Nom: [didaktalasj, didáktalasj]
    didaktalasj+A+Sg+Acc: [didaktalattjav, didáktalattjav]
    didaktalasj+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    didaktalasj+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gåntsas: # 
    gåntsas+A+Attr: gåntsas
    gåntsas+A+Sg+Nom: gåntsas
    gåntsas+A+Sg+Gen: goanntsasa
    gåntsas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [goanntsasabbo,goanntsasæbbo,goanntsasubbo]
    gåntsas+A+Comp+Attr: [goanntsasap, goanntsasup]
    gåntsas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [goanntsasamos,goanntsasæmos,goanntsasumos]

  Adjective - hæhkkaráduk: # BASSTEL, AGAdj
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Attr: hæhkkaráduk
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkaráduk, hæhkkarádak]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Sg+Com: [hæhkkarádugijn, hæhkkarádagijn]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkarádugabbo,hæhkkarádugæbbo, hæhkkarádugubbo hæhkkarádagabbo, hæhkkarádagæbbo,hæhkkarádagubbo]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkarádugamos,hæhkkarádugæmos,hæhkkarádugumos hæhkkarádagamos, hæhkkarádagumos,hæhkkarádagæmos]

  Adjective - iehpeformálla: # ÀLLA
    iehpeformálla+A+Attr: [iehpeformála, iehpeformella, iehpeformælla]
    iehpeformálla+A+Sg+Nom: [iehpeformálla, iehpeformella, iehpeformælla]
    iehpeformálla+A+Sg+Ine: [iehpeformálan, iehpeformellan, iehpeformællan]
    iehpeformálla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    iehpeformálla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - lånjok: # BASSTEL, LEXATTR
    lånjok+A+Attr: [lånjogis, låddnjis, lånjugis]
    lånjok+A+Sg+Nom: [lånjok, lånjuk]
    lånjok+A+Sg+Gen: [lånjoga, lånjuga]
    lånjok+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [lånjogabbo,lånjogæbbo, lånjogubbo, lånjugabbo,lånjugæbbo,lånjugubbo]
    lånjok+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [lånjogamos,lånjogæmos,lånjogumos, lånjugamos,lånjugæmos,lånjugumos]

  Adjective - nanos: # TJIEGOS, NUORTTALABBO
    nanos+A+Attr: nanos
    nanos+A+Sg+Nom: nanos
    nanos+A+Sg+Acc: nannusav
    nanos+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nannusabbo, nannusæbbo,nannusubbo, nanusabbo,nanusæbbo,nanusubbo]
    nanos+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [nannusamos,nannusæmos,nannusumos nanusamos,nanusumos,nanusæmos]

  Adjective - tsåhkevigák: # At, AGAdj
    tsåhkevigák+A+Attr: [tsåhkevigák, tsåhkevigágis]
    tsåhkevigák+A+Sg+Nom: tsåhkevigák
    tsåhkevigák+A+Sg+Com: tsåhkevigágijn
    tsåhkevigák+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    tsåhkevigák+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
